Illinois, session 104th, SB2519.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $2, or so much of that amount as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Ecenomic Opportunity 7for its FY 26 ordinary and contingent expenses.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect This Act 9takes effect July 1, 2025.